Washington statutes.
RCW 33.46.070

Depositor's interest upon conversion.

Upon the conversion of a bank into an association, every person who was a depositor of the bank at the time of the conversion shall become and be deemed to be a depositor of the association in a sum equal to the value of the deposits of the depositor in the bank as of the day on which the conversion was consummated.

[ 1982 c 3 s 86; 1975 1st ex.s. c 83 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.